Hawaii statutes.
§157-15 Audit of books and accounts.
The board of agriculture may examine and audit the books and accounts of
licensed producers, producer-distributors, and distributors for the purpose of
determining how payments to producers and producer-distributors are computed,
whether the amounts of the payments are fair, or whether any provisions of this
chapter affecting such payments, directly or indirectly, have been or are being
violated. The board may also examine and audit the costs of the production,
handling, processing, distribution, and marketing of milk as they may affect
such payments, directly or indirectly. The board shall conduct a monthly audit
with Federal Milk Marketing Order specifications which examines and verifies
milk utilization by the processing plants. The board may also contract for an
independent audit with Federal Milk Marketing Order specifications to examine
and verify milk utilization by the processing plants at least once during the
fiscal year for each processor when:

(1) A class I milk only situation exists; and

(2) Milk is utilized for other than class I purposes
or rejected for reasons other than antibiotics, high temperature, low
cryoscope, off-flavor, somatic cell count, or as determined necessary by the
board.

The audit report for each processing plant shall be
made available after completion. [L 1967, c 260, §8; HRS §157-15; am L 1988, c
25, §2; am L 1994, c 144, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next